District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

3-3506

Administration.

Expired.

Feb. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-72, § 7, 40 DCR 7585

History

1981 Ed., § 2-3906.

Prior Codifications

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 10-72

See note to § 3-3501.